Hawaii statutes.
§467E-13 Prohibited acts; penalties.
(a) No person shall:

(1) Use in connection with the person's name any
designation tending to imply that the person is a social worker, licensed
bachelor social worker, licensed social worker, or licensed clinical social
worker unless the person is duly licensed and authorized under this chapter;

(2) Represent oneself as a social worker, licensed
bachelor social worker, licensed social worker, or licensed clinical social
worker during the time the person's license issued under this chapter is
forfeited, terminated, suspended, or revoked;

(3) Perform clinical diagnosis or psychotherapy
unless the person is a licensed clinical social worker; or

(4) Engage in autonomous and independent clinical
social work practice without being licensed as a licensed clinical social
worker.

(b) Any person who violates this section shall
be subject to a fine of not more than $1,000 and each day's violation shall be
deemed a separate offense. [L 1994, c 251, pt of §2; am L 2001, c 229, §§3, 5;
am L 2002, c 16, §29 and c 167, §§15, 17]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next